Hawaii, session 2025, HB783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a reliable irrigation system is the lifeline of Hawaii's agricultural industry.  To ensure that Hawaii's crops receive a steady and dependable supply of water, sufficient funding is needed to maintain and improve Hawaii's irrigation systems. Increasing weather tendencies of extended drought events highlight the need for timely repair and maintenance of these systems. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Authorize the issuance of general obligation bonds and appropriate funds for capital improvement projects for the State's irrigation systems; and (2)  Convert the means of financing for certain irrigation positions in the department of agriculture from the irrigation system revolving fund to the general fund. SECTION 2.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for irrigation systems in the State; provided that the funds shall be allocated as follows: (1)  $ for Waimea irrigation system improvements on Hawaii island; (2)  $ for Waiahole irrigation system improvements on the island of Oahu; (3)  $ for Molokai irrigation system improvements; (4)  $ for east Maui irrigation system improvements; (5)  $ for Kohala ditch system improvements on Hawaii island; (6)  $ for upcountry Maui irrigation system improvements; (7)  $ for east Kauai irrigation system improvements; (8)  $ for Kokee irrigation system improvements on the island of Kauai; (9)  $ for Kekaha irrigation system improvements on the island of Kauai; (10)  $ for Wahiawa irrigation system improvements on the island of Oahu; and (11)  $ for agricultural infrastructure improvements statewide. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  The means of financing for the following positions within the department of agriculture shall be converted from the irrigation system revolving fund established pursuant to section 167-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to the general fund: (1)  Account clerk III (position number 9874); (2)  Irrigation systems services worker I (position number 9877); (3)  Irrigation systems services worker I (position number 12995); (4)  Irrigation systems services worker I (position number 14857); (5)  Irrigation systems services worker II (position number 18401); (6)  Office assistant III (position number 47967); (7)  Engineer IV (position number 47978); (8)  Irrigation systems services worker I (position number 110416); and (9)  Irrigation systems services worker II (position number 117895). SECTION 4.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.